Utah statutes.
26-18-9.   Prohibited acts of state or local employees of Medicaid program -- Violation a misdemeanor.

Each state or local employee responsible for the expenditure of funds under the state Medicaid program, each individual who formerly was such an officer or employee, and each partner of such an officer or employee is prohibited for a period of one year after termination of such responsibility from committing any act, the commission of which by an officer or employee of the United States Government, an individual who was such an officer or employee, or a partner of such an officer or employee is prohibited by Section 207 or Section 208 of Title 18, United  States Code.  Violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

